src/phonology/nio-phon-old.xfscript
! This file is a script for the Xerox xfst interface.
! It gives the morphophonological rules for Veps.


! In this file, testcases are marked as follows:

! space exclmark euro space upper:lower
! Please add tests for eventual new rules or problems

! To test: in kt/nio/src, do:
! xfst -e "source xfst-nio.txt"
! 
! save s
! quit
! cat xfst-nio.txt | grep €|cut -d" " -f3|cut -d":" -f1|lookup s


clear stack


! Definition section !
! ================== !

echo << THE DEFININTIONS >>

define Cns [ б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н 
           | Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Л | М | Н  
           | ӈ | п | р | с | т 
           | Ӈ | П | Р | С | Т 
           | Ǯ | ǯ ] ; ! The last two are Latin Letter Ezh with caron

define Vws [ а | о | ә | у | ү | ө | е | и | я 
           | А | О | Ә | У | Ү | Ө | Е | И | Я ] ;

define Glottal [ ˮ | ʼ ] ; ! soft sign

define Lts [ Cns | Vws | Glottal ] ; !

define Dummy %> ; 



! Rule section !
! ============ !

echo << THE RULES >>


define VowelCorrelation [ V1 -> а || [ QAO1 ]  %> h _ ,,
                          V1 -> e || [ i ] %> h _ ,,
                          V1 -> e || [ QEQ ]  %> h _  ,,
                          V1 -> o || o %> h _   ] ; ! Vowel harmony

define StemFinalVowelLoss [ QAO1 -> 0 , QEQ -> 0 || _ .#. ] ;
 !€ ты>хА1на:тэхэна

define QAO [ QAO1 -> a || _ %> [ n | d | t a | k s | l | h V1 | n n o | d m e | s ] ,,
            QAO1 -> o || _ %> i ] ;

define S2SH     [ s -> š || i %> _ ] ;

define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;



read regex [

    VowelCorrelation
.o. StemFinalVowelLoss
.o. QAO
.o. S2SH
.o. DummyDeletion
] ;
